California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) Every vendor shall submit to the swap meet operator the form disclosing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 for each swap meet at which he or she is a vendor prior to the close of the business day at which the item is to be placed on sale. Items described in reports previously submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 21663 may be omitted from the description on the forms submitted at subsequent swap meets if the vendor furnishes the swap meet operator of each subsequent swap meet with two copies of the report previously submitted, marked to indicate personal property currently being offered or displayed.

(c) A vendor who regularly offers or displays for sale or exchange any new or used personal property or merchandise shall be required to submit to the swap meet operator the form disclosing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 only once every 60 days. The vendor shall, however, submit a new report at any swap meet at which he or she is a vendor and offers or displays for sale or exchange any personal property not included by generic classification in the previously submitted report. For purposes of this subdivision, a vendor shall be deemed to regularly offer or display for sale or exchange any items of merchandise if such vendor participates for four or more days in a month at a swap meet conducted at the same location. Any vendor claiming to be a regular seller of new or used merchandise under the provisions of this subdivision shall so indicate on the bimonthly report.

(d) Every vendor shall submit to the swap meet operator the form disclosing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 for each swap meet at which he or she is a vendor prior to the business day on which the item is to be placed on sale. A vendor who regularly offers or displays merchandise for sale or exchange shall be required to submit to the swap meet operator the form disclosing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 only once every six months, provided the vendor has a written agreement with the swap meet operator for a periodic term of one month or longer. All other casual vendors shall submit the form disclosing the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 21663 on each instance of offering merchandise for sale or exchange at the swap meet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1138, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21665.

(a) Swap meet operators shall retain a copy of the reports collected by them for six months and shall make the copies available for inspection, upon request, by a peace officer as defined in Section 830.1 or subdivision (a) of Section 830.3 of the Penal Code, or a peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2 of the Penal Code, when the swap meet occurs on state property, or properly identified representatives of the State Board of Equalization or Department of Justice.

(b) Vendors shall have available for inspection during the swap meet a completed copy of the report form which was submitted to the swap meet operator describing the goods offered or displayed for sale or exchange at the swap meet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 305, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21666.

(a) Upon request, a vendor shall provide the purchaser a written receipt disclosing the vendor’s name and address for any items purchased which has a selling price in excess of fifteen dollars ($15).

(b) No vendor shall offer or display at a swap meet any new or used personal property or merchandise of a kind which the swap meet operator has expressly prohibited. Every swap meet owner shall post or display in prominent places at the swap meet, or give written notice to every vendor prior to the commencement of a swap meet of the kinds of personal property or merchandise which may be not offered for sale or exchange. The swap meet owner or operator shall also post a sign at the main entrance of the swap meet which states that vendors are required to issue receipts in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21667.

A violation of any provision of this article, except subdivision (b) of Section 21666, is a misdemeanor and may be punishable by up to six months in county jail, a fine of fifty dollars ($50) for the first violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for the second violation, and two hundred dollars ($200) for the third and subsequent violations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 58.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

21668.

A chief of police of a city or the sheriff of an area outside of the city may waive any requirement of this article for swap meet operators and vendors in the city or area outside of the city if the chief of police or sheriff determines it is not necessary or appropriate in the public interest to impose the requirement. If the swap meet is located in both the city and area outside of the city, the chief of police of the city has the authority to grant the waiver authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 732, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.

(a) All swap meets which are conducted two or more times per calendar year on any premises or property owned or leased by any city, county, city and county, state, or any other local governmental agency, entity, or board, shall comply with all of the following procedures:

(1) The swap meet operator shall have a valid business license.

(2) The swap meet operator shall have a valid California seller’s permit number (State Board of Equalization sales tax number), if applicable.

(3) The swap meet operator shall provide the state or local governmental entities described in this subdivision upon whose property the swap meet is being held, a certificate of insurance certifying that the swap meet operator maintains public liability and property damage insurance for the operation of the swap meet of at least two million dollars ($2,000,000), and that the policy names that governmental entity as an additional insured under the policy.

(4) The swap meet operator shall provide the state or local governmental entity a hold harmless and idemnification agreement for his or her operation of the swap meet and activities and acts arising from that swap meet.

(5) The swap meet operator shall comply with all other provisions of this article relating to swap meets.

(b) State or local governmental entities shall not operate or manage a swap meet for profit in direct competition to a private enterprise, unless they comply with subdivision (a) of Section 21662.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1138, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21669.1.

In addition to the requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 21669, all swap meets conducted on the premises or property of a state or local governmental entity that has or expects to have an average daily attendance of 10,000 or more persons shall provide all of the following:

(a) A statement of ownership, including the identity of individuals holding a financial interest of 5 percent or more.

(b) A sworn statement that no individuals who have a financial interest of 5 percent or more in the swap meet have been convicted of any crime involving dishonesty or moral turpitude.

(c) A financial statement showing the operator’s financial capability to operate a major swap meet and to meet any financial obligations to the lessor and subcontractors.

(d) A statement that the operator is not knowingly delinquent in any payments owed to a state or local governmental entity and that he or she is not knowingly in violation of any state or local law or ordinance related to public health or safety standards.

(e) Evidence that the operator has a minimum of five years of experience in the management and operation of a swap meet for profit with an average daily attendance of 5,000 or more.

(f) A plan for operations, including security, crowd control, sanitation, and emergency medical response.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Sports Trading Cards [21670. - 21672.]

21670.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Altered or refurbished” means repair work which has been performed to enhance the value of the sports trading card as a collectible. This work includes, but is not limited to, filling in holes, building new corners, ironing out creases, or touching up the pictures or borders on the sports trading card.

(b) “Legitimate sports trading card” means any card produced for use in commerce, that contains a company name or team logo, or both, and an image, representation, or facsimile of one or more players or other team member or members in any pose, and is produced pursuant to an appropriate licensing agreement.

(c) “Counterfeit sports trading card” means any card, produced for use in commerce, without appropriate licensing authority, which is a forgery, copy, or imitation of a legitimate sports trading card, produced without authority or right, and with the intention of passing the card for that which is original or genuine.

(d) “Unlicensed sports trading card” means any card that is produced for use in commerce, without proper licensing authority. This definition specifically excludes cards which are bound in publications.

(e) “Appropriate licensing authority” means express, written permission to manufacture, produce, distribute, and sell the sports trading card, as granted by the valid owner or owners of the licensing rights of any image, work, term, name, symbol, logo, or insignia that appears on the sports trading card.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1120, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

21671.

(a) Any sports trading card that is altered or refurbished shall be accompanied by a certificate stating the exact work done to the sports trading card, the date the work was performed, the cost of that work, and the name, phone number, and address of the person who performed the work.

(b) Any person or agent thereof, who knowingly sells or trades a sports card in violation of subdivision (a), shall both:

(1) Refund to the buyer, the full amount paid for the altered or refurbished sports trading card or the full retail value of any nonmonetary consideration received in exchange for the altered or refurbished sports trading card, or both.

(2) Be liable to the buyer for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each card sold represents a separate and distinct violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21672.

(a) Any person, or agent thereof, who knowingly manufactures, produces, or distributes unlicensed or counterfeit sports trading cards with the intent to deceive, injure, or defraud another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person, or agent thereof, who violates this subdivision shall do both of the following:

(1) Refund to the buyer the full amount paid for the unlicensed or counterfeit sports trading card or the full retail value of any nonmonetary consideration received in exchange for the unlicensed or counterfeit sports trading card, or both.

(2) Be liable to the buyer for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each card sold represents a separate and distinct violation.

(b) Any person who knowingly sells a cut, unlicensed sports trading card that has been produced by cutting the card from a publication in which unlicensed sports trading cards are bound, without disclosing the source and the means of producing the card, with the intent to deceive, injure, or defraud another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who violates this subdivision shall do both of the following:

(1) Refund to the buyer the full consideration paid or furnished for the cut, unlicensed sports trading card.

(2) Be liable to the buyer for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. Each card sold represents a separate and distinct violation.

This provision does not apply to a sports trading card that is excluded from the definition of “unlicensed sports trading card” pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 21670 of the Business and Professions Code by reason of being bound in a publication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 360, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Self-Service Storage Facilities [21700. - 21716.]

21700.

This act shall be known as the “California Self-Service Storage Facility Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21701.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Self-service storage facility” means real property designed and used for the purpose of renting or leasing individual storage space to occupants who are to have access to the space for the purpose of storing and removing personal property or for storing individual storage containers provided to occupants who have exclusive use of the container for the purpose of storing and removing personal property, whether or not the individual storage containers are transported pursuant to Section 21701.1. Self-service storage facility does not include a garage or other storage area in a private residence. No occupant may use a
 self-service storage facility for residential purposes. A self-service storage facility is not a warehouse, nor a public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code. If an owner issues a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, or other document of title for the personal property stored, the owner and the occupant are subject to the provisions of Division 7 (commencing with Section 7101) of the Commercial Code, and the provisions of this chapter do not apply.

(b) “Owner” means the owner, operator, lessor, or sublessor of a self-service storage facility, their agent, or any other person authorized by them to manage the facility, or to receive rent from an occupant under a rental agreement, and no real estate license is required.

(c) “Occupant” means a person, or
 their sublessee, successor, or assign, who is entitled to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility under a rental agreement, to the exclusion of others.

(d) “Rental agreement” means any written agreement or lease that establishes or modifies the terms, conditions, rules, or any other provision concerning the use and occupancy of a self-service storage facility.

(e) “Personal property” means movable property not affixed to land, and includes, but is not limited to, goods, merchandise, furniture, and household items.

(f) “Last known address” means that mailing address or email address provided by the occupant in the latest rental agreement, or the mailing address or email address provided by
 the occupant in a subsequent written notice of a change of address.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 1.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21701.1.

(a) The owner or operator of a self-service storage facility or a household goods carrier, may, for a fee, transport individual storage containers to and from a self-service storage facility that he or she owns or operates. This transportation activity, whether performed by an owner, operator, or carrier, shall not be deemed transportation for compensation or hire as a business of used household goods and
 is not subject to regulation under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code, provided that all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The fee charged (A) to deliver an empty individual storage container to a customer and to transport the loaded container to a self-service storage facility or (B) to return a loaded individual storage container from a self-service storage facility to the customer does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) The owner, operator, or carrier, or any affiliate of the owner, operator, or carrier, does not load, pack, or otherwise handle the contents of the container.

(3) The owner, operator, or carrier is registered under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 34620) of Division 14.85 of the Vehicle Code or holds a permit under Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(4) The owner, operator, or carrier has procured and maintained cargo insurance in the amount of at least twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per shipment. Proof of cargo insurance coverage shall be maintained on file and presented to the Department of Motor Vehicles or Public Utilities Commission upon written request.

(5) The owner, operator, or carrier shall disclose to the customer in advance the following information regarding the container transfer service offered, in a written document separate from others furnished at the time of disclosure:

(A) A detailed description of the transfer service, including a commitment to use its best efforts to place the container in an appropriate location designated by the customer.

(B) The dimensions and construction of the individual storage containers used.

(C) The unit charge, if any, for the container transfer service that is in addition to the storage charge or any other fees under the rental agreement.

(D) The availability of delivery or pickup by the customer of his or her goods at the self-service storage facility.

(E) The maximum allowable distance, measured from the self-service storage facility, for the initial pickup and final delivery of the loaded container.

(F) The precise terms of the company’s right to move a container from the initial storage location at its own discretion and a statement that the customer will not be required to pay additional charges
 with respect to that transfer.

(G) Conspicuous disclosure in bold text of the allocation of responsibility for the risk of loss or damage to the customer’s goods, including any disclaimer of the company’s liability, and the procedure for presenting any claim regarding loss or damage to the company.

The disclosure of terms and conditions required by this subdivision, and the rental agreement, shall be received by the customer a minimum of 72 hours prior to delivery of the empty individual storage container; however, the customer may, in writing, knowingly and voluntarily waive that receipt. The company shall record in writing, and retain for a period of at least six months after the end of the rental, the time and method of delivery of the information, any waiver made by the customer, and the times and dates of initial pickup and redelivery of the containerized goods.

(6) No later than the time the empty individual storage container is delivered to the customer, the company shall provide the customer with an informational brochure containing the following information about loading the container:

(A) Packing and loading tips to minimize damage in transit.

(B) A suggestion that the customer make an inventory of the items as they are loaded and keep any other record (for example, photographs or video recording) that may assist in any subsequent claims processing.

(C) A list of items that are impermissible to pack in the container (for example, flammable items).

(D) A list of items that are not recommended to be packed in light of foreseeable hazards inherent
 in the company’s handling of the containers and in light of any limitation of liability contained in the rental agreement.

(b) Pickup and delivery of the individual storage containers shall be on a date agreed upon between the customer and the company. If the company requires the customer to be physically present at the time of pickup, the company shall in fact be at the customer’s premises prepared to perform the service not more than four hours later than the scheduled time agreed to by the customer and company, and in the event of a preventable breach of that obligation by the company, the customer shall be entitled to receive a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) from the company and to elect rescission of the rental agreement without liability.

(c) No charge shall be assessed with respect to any movement of the container between self-service storage facilities by the company at
 its own discretion, nor for the delivery of a container to a customer’s premises if the customer advises the company, at least 24 hours before the agreed time of container dropoff, orally or in writing, that he or she is rescinding the request for service.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, “individual storage container” means a container that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) It shall be fully enclosed and locked.

(2) It contains not less than 100 cubic feet and not more than 1,100 cubic feet.

(3) It is constructed out of a durable material appropriate for repeated use. A box constructed out of cardboard or a similar material shall not constitute an individual storage container for purposes of this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the Public Utilities Commission to investigate and commence an appropriate enforcement action pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5101) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code against any person transporting household goods in individual storage containers in a manner other than that described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 10.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

21702.

The owner of a self-service storage facility and his or her heirs, executors, administrators, successors, and assigns have a lien upon all personal property located at a self-service storage facility for rent, labor, late payment fees, or other charges, present or future, incurred pursuant to the rental agreement and for expenses necessary for the preservation, sale, or disposition of personal property subject to the provisions of this chapter. The lien may be enforced consistent with the provisions in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21702.5.

(a) Any lien on a vehicle or vessel subject to registration or identification under the Vehicle Code that has attached and is set forth in the documents of title to the vehicle or vessel shall have priority over any lien created pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Any lien created pursuant to this chapter on a vehicle or vessel subject to
 registration or identification under the Vehicle Code shall be enforced in accordance with Section 3071 of the Civil Code, in the case of a vehicle, or Section 503 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, in the case of a vessel, and not as prescribed in Sections 21705 to 21711, inclusive.

(c) Any lien created pursuant to this chapter on a vehicle or vessel subject to registration or identification under the Vehicle Code shall not include any charges for rent, labor, or other services incurred pursuant to the rental agreement, accruing more than 60 days after the date the lien imposed pursuant to this chapter attaches, as set forth in Section 21705, and before application is made for authorization to conduct the lien sale pursuant to the requirements of Section 3071 of the Civil Code or Section 503 of the Harbors and Navigation Code.

(d) Any proceeds from a lien sale shall be disposed
 of pursuant to Section 3073 of the Civil Code, in the case of a vehicle, or Section 507.5 of the Harbors and Navigation Code, in the case of a vessel.

(e) In addition to the right to foreclose on the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer, the owner may have the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer towed from the premises if rent and other charges have not been paid for 60 days and the notice required in Section 21703 has been sent. Not less than 10 days before having the vehicle towed, the owner shall send notice by first-class mail with certificate of mailing to the occupant’s last known address stating the name, address, and telephone number of the towing company and the street address of the location where the towed property can be redeemed. When the towing company takes possession of the vehicle, watercraft, or trailer, the owner shall not be liable for the property or damage to the property. The towing company shall be in compliance with Section
 12520 of the Vehicle Code, and shall act in accordance with Section 22658 of the Vehicle Code in removing the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   (AB 983)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21703.

If any part of the rent or other charges due from an occupant remain unpaid for 14 consecutive days, an owner may terminate the right of the occupant to the use of the storage space at a self-service storage facility by sending a notice to the occupant’s last known address and to the alternative address specified in subdivision (b) of Section 21712. The notice shall be sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, by regular first-class mail if the owner obtains a certificate of mailing indicating the date the notice was mailed, or by email pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21712. The notice shall contain all of the following:

(a) An itemized statement of the owner’s claim showing the sums due at the
 time of the notice and the date when the sums became due.

(b) A statement that the occupant’s right to use the storage space will terminate on a specified date (not less than 14 days after the mailing of the notice) unless all sums due are paid by the occupant before the specified date.

(c) A notice that the occupant may be denied access to the storage space after the termination date if the sums are not paid and that an owner’s lien, as provided for in Section 21702, may be imposed thereafter.

(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the owner or their designated agent whom the occupant may contact to respond to the notice.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 3.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21704.

A notice in substantially the following form shall satisfy the requirements of Section 21703: PRELIMINARY LIEN NOTICETO (occupant)(address)(state)You owe and have not paid rent and/or other charges for the use ofstorage (space number)at (name and address of storage facility) .These charges total $ (amount)and have been due for more than 14 days. They are itemized as follows:Due DateDescriptionAmountTOTAL: $__________If this sum is not paid in full before(date at least 14 days from mailing)your right to use the storage space will terminate, you will be denied access, and an owner’s lien on any stored property will be imposed.You may pay this sum and may contact the owner at:(name)(address)(state)(telephone)(date)(owner’s signature)

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21705.

(a) If the notice has been sent as required by Section 21703 and the total sum due has not been paid by the termination date specified in the preliminary lien notice, the lien imposed by this chapter attaches as of that date and the owner may do all of the following:

(1) Deny an occupant access to the space.

(2) Enter the space.

(3) Remove any property found therein to a place of safekeeping.

(b) Upon taking the actions described in subdivision (a), the owner shall send to the occupant, by certified mail, or
 by first-class mail if the owner obtains a certificate of mailing, postage prepaid, addressed to the occupant’s last known address, and to the alternative address specified in subdivision (b) of Section 21712, or by email pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21712, both of the following:

(1) A notice of lien sale that states all of the following:

(A) That the occupant’s right to use the storage space has terminated and that the occupant no longer has access to the stored property.

(B) That the stored property is subject to a lien, the current amount of the lien, and that the lien will continue to increase if rent is not paid.

(C) That the property
 will be sold to satisfy the lien after a specified date that is not less than 14 days from the date of mailing the notice, unless the occupant executes and returns by certified mail a declaration in opposition to lien sale in the form set forth in paragraph (2).

(D) A statement that the occupant may regain full use of the space by paying the full lien amount before the date specified in subparagraph (C).

(E) That any excess proceeds of the sale over the lien amount and costs of sale will be retained by the owner and may be reclaimed by the occupant or claimed by another person at any time for a period of one year from the sale and that thereafter the proceeds will escheat to the county in which the sale is to take place.

(2) A blank declaration in opposition to lien sale that shall be in substantially the following form:“DECLARATION IN OPPOSITION TO LIEN SALEYou must complete all sections of this declaration. If the owner cannot contact or serve you at the physical address and telephone number that you provide below, this declaration shall be void and the owner may sell your stored property.I,(occupant’s name) , have received the notice of
 lien saleof the property stored at (location and space #).I oppose the lien sale of the property, because (provide a brief explanation of the reason the owner’s lien may not be valid. For example, “I have paid my rent and other charges in full.”):My current address and telephone number are:(physical address)(city)(state)(ZIP Code)(telephone number)I understand that the lienholder may file an action against me in any court of competent jurisdiction, including small claims court, at the address provided above, and if a judgment is given in the lienholder’s favor, I may be liable for the court costs. I also understand that this declaration is not valid if (a) the address provided in this declaration is not my current address or (b) I change my address at any time prior to service of an action on the lien and I
 do not provide the owner the address within 10 days of the change.I declare under penalty of perjury that the foregoing is true and correct, and that this declaration was signed by me on(date) at (place) .(signature of occupant)Return this declaration to:(self-service storage facility address)”

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 36, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 420, Sec. 5.   (AB 2960)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21706.

If a declaration in opposition to the lien sale, executed under penalty of perjury, is not received by the owner on or prior to the date specified in the notice of lien sale by certified mail, is not completed and signed by the occupant, or if the occupant withdraws the declaration in opposition to the lien sale in writing, the owner may, subject to Sections 21708 and 21709, sell the property upon complying with the requirements
 set forth in Section 21707.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 778, Sec. 3.   (AB 983)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

21707.

(a) (1) After the expiration of the time given in the notice of lien sale, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 21705, or following the failure of a claimant to pay rent or obtain a court order pursuant to Section 21709, an advertisement of the sale shall be published before the sale in either of the following ways:

(A) Once per week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district where the sale is to be held or in the county where the self-service storage facility is located.

(B) Once in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public
 notice district where the sale is to be held or in the county where the self-service storage facility is located and once on any publicly accessible internet website that customarily conducts or advertises online auctions or sales. The online advertisement shall remain online for seven days before the sale.

(2) If, pursuant to either subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1), there is no newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district where the sale is to be held or in the county where the self-service storage facility is located, the advertisement shall be posted at least 10 days before the sale in not less than 6 conspicuous places in the neighborhood of the proposed sale.

(3) The advertisement shall include the name of the person on whose account the
 goods are being stored and the name and location of the storage facility.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The sale shall be conducted in a commercially reasonable manner. After deducting the amount of the lien and costs of sale, the owner shall retain any excess proceeds of the sale on the occupant’s behalf. The occupant, or any other person having a court order or other judicial process against the property, may claim the excess proceeds, or a portion thereof sufficient to satisfy the particular claim, at any time within one year of the date of sale. Thereafter, the owner shall pay
 any remaining excess proceeds to the treasury of the county in which the sale was held.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, a commercially reasonable manner of sale includes, but is not limited to, an in-person auction or a sale on a publicly accessible internet website that customarily conducts online auctions or sales.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 13.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21708.

Any person who has a perfected security interest under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code may claim any personal property subject to the security interest and subject to a lien pursuant to this chapter by paying the total amount due, as specified in the preliminary lien notice, for the storage of the property, if no declaration of opposition to the lien sale is executed and returned by the occupant. Upon payment of the total amount due, the owner shall deliver possession of the particular property subject to the security interest to the person who paid the total amount due. The owner shall not be liable to any person for any
 action taken pursuant to this section if the owner has fully complied with the requirements of Sections 21704 and 21705.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21709.

Prior to any sale pursuant to Section 21707, any person claiming a right to the goods may pay the amount necessary to satisfy the lien together with one month’s rent in advance. In that event, the goods shall not be sold, but shall be retained by the owner pending a court order directing the disposition of the property. If a court order is not obtained within 30 days following the date of the payment pursuant to this section, the
 claimant shall pay the owner the monthly rental charge for the space where the property is stored pursuant to the terms of the rental agreement. If the claimant does not pay this rent, the owner may sell or dispose of the personal property in accordance with Section 21707. The owner shall have no liability for the sale or other disposition of the personal property to any claimant who fails to secure a court order or pay the required rental charge as set forth in this section, provided the owner has fully complied with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 439, Sec. 5.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21710.

(a) If a valid declaration in opposition to lien sale is received by the owner prior to the date set forth in the notice of lien sale, the owner may enforce the lien only as follows:

(1) File an action to enforce the lien in small claims court as provided in Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 116.110) of Title 1 of Part 1 of the Code of Civil
 Procedure, provided that the amount of the lien is within the monetary jurisdiction of the court. If the action is filed in small claims court, all of the procedures set forth in that chapter shall apply, including the procedures for service of the summons and complaint.

(2) File an action to enforce the lien in any other court of competent jurisdiction, in which case the summons and complaint may be served by certified mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the occupant at the address provided by the occupant in the declaration of lien sale, and service shall be deemed completed on the fifth day after the mailing, or in any other manner authorized by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) If the owner is granted a judgment in favor of the lien, the owner may advertise the goods for sale and sell the property as provided in
 Section 21707.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 439, Sec. 7.   (AB 655)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

21711.

A purchaser in good faith of goods sold to enforce a lien or a judgment entered on the lien in favor of the owner on goods stored at a self-service storage facility takes the goods free of any rights of persons against whom the lien was claimed, despite noncompliance by the owner of the storage facility with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21712.

(a) Each contract for the rental or lease of individual storage space in a self-service storage facility shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required or permitted by law to be included, a statement that the occupant’s property will be subject to a claim of lien and may even be sold to satisfy the lien if the rent or other charges due remain unpaid for 14 consecutive days and that those actions are authorized by this chapter.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply, and the lien authorized by this chapter shall not attach, unless the rental agreement requests, and provides space for, the occupant to give the name and mailing or email
 address of another person to whom the preliminary lien notice and subsequent notices required to be given under this chapter may be sent. Notices sent pursuant to Section 21703 or 21705 shall be sent to the occupant’s address and the alternative address, if both addresses are provided by the occupant. Failure of an occupant to provide an alternative address shall not affect an owner’s remedies under this chapter or under any other law.

(c) (1) The owner may send the notices required by Sections 21703 and 21705 to the occupant and to the alternative address specified in subdivision (b) by email only if both of the following conditions are met:

(A) The rental agreement states that lien notices may be sent to the occupant and to the alternate by email.
